Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4103.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial Intelligence is es-
tablished within the office of Enterprise Information Services. The purpose of the commis-
sion is to identify and report on long-term policy implications in the use of artificial
intelligence technologies by the state government of Oregon to assist policymakers in mak-
ing strategic, well-informed decisions that foster innovation while safeguarding the well-
being of Oregonians.
(2) The commission shall:
(a) Conduct literature reviews of public policy issues around the use by state government
of artificial intelligence technologies, including the benefits and risks to the broader public
and historically disadvantaged communities, taking into consideration equity, workforce im-
pacts and ethical concerns;
(b) Conduct reviews of existing protections under federal and state laws of individuals’
data and privacy rights, civil rights, intellectual property rights and safety, and how federal
and state laws that apply to artificial intelligence technologies align, differ, conflict or
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 120

A-Eng. HB 4103
interact;
(c) Identify uses of artificial intelligence systems by the state that present or create a
high risk to individuals, such as risks to individuals’ safety, employment rights, civil rights
or constitutional rights;
(d) Provide recommendations on the use of artificial intelligence by the state;
(e) Identify impacts from the use of artificial intelligence systems by the state on privacy
interests of individuals in this state and what policies are needed to protect individuals’ pri-
vacy interests from any diminution caused by the use of artificial intelligence systems in the
public sector;
(f) Identify impacts and opportunities related to the use of artificial intelligence systems
on public sector jobs and incomes in this state and recommend policies to protect public
sector jobs and incomes from adverse effects from the use of artificial intelligence systems
by the state;
(g) Conduct a review of issues around unlawful discrimination, on the basis of race, color,
national origin, creed, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability, age, vet-
eran or military status, marital status, family status or any other protected class, from the
use of artificial intelligence systems by the state and provide recommendations for mitigat-
ing or protecting against such discrimination;
(h) Provide recommendations on prioritizing transparency to improve the understanding
of the behavior and functional components of artificial intelligence systems used by the state
and enable the identification of performance issues, safety and privacy concerns, biases,
exclusionary practices and unintended outcomes;
(i) Conduct a review of legal and contractual protections for individual personhood, in-
cluding for individuals employed by the state, against the use of artificial intelligence sys-
tems to create an artificial replica, including an artificial replica of a person’s voice, image
or likeness; and
(j) Conduct a review on the use of artificial intelligence systems by the state to support
or make decisions around employment.
(3) The commission shall consist of 10 voting members and six nonvoting members as
follows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint, from among persons jointly recommended by the Presi-
dent of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the following voting
members:
(A) One member who represents public sector employees, including public sector em-
ployees who are members of organized labor unions.
(B) One member who represents labor, trade or professional organizations.
(C) One member who represents the public universities listed in ORS 352.002 and com-
munity colleges, as defined in ORS 341.005, and who has expertise in the design, effects and
ethical use of artificial intelligence systems.
(D) One member who has expertise or a professional background in artificial intelligence
technology.
(E) One member who has expertise in data security.
(F) One member who can reflect the interests and needs of the nine federally recognized
Indian tribes in Oregon, appointed in consultation with the Commission on Indian Services.
(G) One member who has expertise in energy systems and natural resource management.
[2]

A-Eng. HB 4103
(H) One member who has lived experience with a multimodal communication disorder and
with the use of artificial intelligence.
(b) The Governor shall appoint, subject to confirmation by the Senate in the manner
prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565, the following voting members:
(A) One member who represents communities that are disproportionately vulnerable to
being harmed by algorithmic bias.
(B) One member who represents public safety.
(c) The nonvoting members shall be:
(A) The designee of the State Chief Information Officer, who specializes in artificial in-
telligence strategy and privacy concerns.
(B) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries or the commissioner’s
designee.
(C) The Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee.
(D) The Secretary of State or the secretary’s designee.
(E) The State Treasurer or the State Treasurer’s designee.
(F) A representative from the Judicial Department, appointed by the Chief Justice of the
Supreme Court.
(4) The term of office of each voting member is three years. A voting member serves
at the pleasure of the appointing authority. Before the expiration of the term of a voting
member, the appointing authority shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January
1 of the following year. A voting member may be reappointed. If there is a vacancy for any
cause, the appointing authority shall make an appointment to become immediately effective
for the unexpired term.
(5)(a) The commission may establish one or more advisory committees to advise in an
area impacted by artificial intelligence used by the state. An advisory committee may be
established for an ongoing or limited duration. In establishing an advisory committee, the
commission shall define the advisory committee’s charge, subject area of focus and scope of
activity.
(b) Members of an advisory committee are appointed from among the voting members
of the commission by the chairperson of the commission, subject to approval by a majority
of the voting members of the commission.
(c) An advisory committee shall consist of no more than seven members.
(d) Members of an advisory committee must represent a broad and diverse cross section
of stakeholders in the area advised on by the advisory committee.
(e) One voting member of the commission may serve on an advisory committee estab-
lished under this subsection, as the chair of the advisory committee.
(6) All agencies of state government, as defined in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist the
commission in the performance of the duties of the commission and, to the extent permitted
by laws relating to confidentiality, to provide information and advice that the members of
the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
(7) On or before September 1 of each year, the commission shall submit a report in the
manner provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, regu-
lations or policies, to the Legislative Assembly related to information management and
technology.
(8) A majority of voting members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the
[3]

A-Eng. HB 4103
transaction of business.
(9) The commission shall elect one of its voting members to serve as chairperson of the
commission.
(10) The commission shall meet at least once every three months at times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the voting members of the com-
mission.
(11) Members of the commission shall be paid compensation and expenses as provided in
ORS 292.495 from such funds as may be available to the commission.
(12) The designee of the State Chief Information Officer shall provide resources and
staffing required by the commission to carry out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding the term of office specified in section 1 (4) of this 2026 Act,
of the voting members first appointed to the Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial
Intelligence:
(1) Four shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2027.
(2) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2028.
(3) Three shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2029.
SECTION 3. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall employ, at the
appointment of the State Chief Information Officer, an individual responsible for developing
the strategic vision for the state relating to privacy, data protection and artificial intelli-
gence.
(2) The individual employed under subsection (1) of this section shall:
(a) Assist and advise the Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial Intelligence
established under section 1 of this 2026 Act; and
(b) Provide policy and support staff to the commission to assist the commission in car-
rying out the commission’s duties.
SECTION 4. The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may charge a fee to a
state agency, officer, board or commission for the cost incurred by the department or the
Senator Aaron Woods Commission on Artificial Intelligence in providing services related to
artificial intelligence systems requested by a state agency, officer, board or commission.
SECTION 5. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $_______, which may be expended by the de-
partment to hire additional full-time employees to enable the individual employed under
section 3 of this 2026 Act to carry out the individual’s duties under sections 1 and 3 of this
2026 Act.

[4]